da: Understøttede USB-enhedstyper: Ekstern USB HDD; Ekstern USB SSD; USB-kortlæser; USB-flashdrev; Andet
ru: Поддерживаемые типы USB-устройств: Внешний USB HDD; Внешний USB SSD; USB-кардридер; Флеш-накопитель USB; Другой
ja: サポートされるUSBデバイスタイプ: 外付けUSB HDD; 外付けUSB SSD; USBカードリーダー; USBフラッシュドライブ; その他
bg-BG: Поддържани типове USB устройства: Външен USB HDD; Външен USB SSD; USB четец на карти; USB флаш устройство; Други
cs: Podporované typy USB zařízení: Externí USB HDD; Externí USB SSD; USB čtečka karet; USB flash disk; Jiné
nl: Ondersteunde USB-apparaattypen: Externe USB HDD; Externe USB SSD; USB-kaartlezer; USB-stick; Andere
nb: Støttede USB-enhetstyper: Ekstern USB HDD; Ekstern USB SSD; USB-kortleser; Minnepenn; Annet
pl: Obsługiwane typy urządzeń USB: Zewnętrzny dysk HDD USB; Zewnętrzny dysk SSD USB; Czytnik kart USB; Napęd flash USB; Inne
hr-HR: Podržani tipovi USB uređaja: Vanjski USB HDD; Vanjski USB SSD; USB čitač kartica; USB Flash memorija; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipos de dispositivos USB suportados: HDD USB externo; SSD USB externo; Leitor de cartões USB; Pen USB; Outro
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ USB ที่รองรับ: ฮาร์ดไดร์ฟ USB ภายนอก; SSD USB ภายนอก; ตัวอ่านการ์ด USB; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB; อื่นๆ
ko: 지원되는 USB 장치 유형: 외장 USB HDD; 외장 USB SSD; USB 카드 리더; USB 플래시 드라이브; 기타
sv: USB-enhetstyper som stöds: Extern USB-hårddisk; Extern USB-SSD; USB-kortläsare; USB-minne; Övrigt
fi: Tuetut USB-laitetyypit: Ulkoinen USB HDD; Ulkoinen USB SSD; USB-kortinlukija; USB-muistitikku; Muu
fr: Types de périphériques USB pris en charge: Disque dur USB externe; SSD USB externe; Lecteur de carte USB; Clés USB; Autre
de: Unterstützte USB-Gerätetypen: Externe USB-HDD; Externe USB-SSD; USB-Kartenleser; USB-Stick; Sonstiges
en: Supported USB device types: External USB HDD; External USB SSD; USB card reader; USB flash drive; Other
tr: Desteklenen USB cihaz tipleri: Harici USB HDD; Harici USB SSD; USB kart okuyucu; USB bellek; Diğer
vi: Loại thiết bị USB được hỗ trợ: HDD USB ngoài; SSD USB ngoài; Đầu đọc thẻ USB; Ổ đĩa USB Flash; Khác
pt-BR: Tipos de dispositivos USB suportados: HDD USB externo; SSD USB externo; Leitor de cartão USB; Flash Drive USB; Outro
lt-LT: Palaikomi USB įrenginių tipai: Išorinis USB HDD; Išorinis USB SSD; USB kortelių skaitytuvas; USB atmintinė; Kita
sl-SI: Podprti tipi naprav USB: Zunanji USB HDD; Zunanji USB SSD; USB čitalnik kartic; USB bliskovni pogon; Drugo
ro-RO: Tipuri de dispozitive USB suportate: HDD USB extern; SSD USB extern; Cititor de carduri USB; USB flash drive; Altele
es: Tipos de dispositivos USB soportados: HDD USB externo; SSD USB externo; Lector de tarjetas USB; Unidad flash USB; Otros
sk-SK: Podporované typy USB zariadení: Externý USB HDD; Externý USB SSD; USB čítačka kariet; USB flash disk; Iné
hu: Támogatott USB-eszköztípusok: Külső USB HDD; Külső USB SSD; USB kártyaolvasó; USB flash meghajtó; Egyéb
zh-TW: 支援的 USB 設備類型: 外接 USB 硬碟; 外接 USB 固態硬碟; USB 讀卡機; 隨身碟; 其他
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι τύποι συσκευών USB: Εξωτερικός σκληρός δίσκος USB; Εξωτερικός SSD USB; Αναγνώστης καρτών USB; Οδηγός USB; Άλλο
it: Tipi di dispositivi USB supportati: HDD USB esterno; SSD USB esterno; Lettore di schede USB; Unità flash USB; Altro
zh-CN: 支持的 USB 设备类型: 外置 USB 硬盘; 外置 USB 固态硬盘; USB 读卡器; USB 闪存驱动器/U 盘; 其他